Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-2701
Current tractor model; testing required; application; procedure; sales and use tax exemption; eligibility; temporary permit; failure to meet requirements; effect.

(1) No person shall be permitted to sell or dispose of any current tractor model of one hundred or more horsepower in the State of Nebraska without first having (a) made application for a permit and obtained a permit to sell the tractor model, (b) the model tested by the University of Nebraska onsite or offsite or by any Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development test station, and (c) the model passed upon by the board.

(2) A person may obtain a permit to sell or dispose of a current tractor model of less than one hundred horsepower by meeting the permit requirements of sections 2-2701 to 2-2711. A purchaser of a current tractor model is not eligible to claim the exemption from sales and use tax for agricultural machinery and equipment under section 77-2704.36 unless the current tractor model has been permitted for sale pursuant to sections 2-2701 to 2-2711.

(3) Each and every tractor model presented for testing shall be a stock model and shall not be equipped with any special accessory unless regularly supplied to the trade. Any tractor model not complying with this section shall not be tested under sections 2-2701 to 2-2711. Applications shall be made to the board and shall be accompanied by specifications of the tractor model required by the board and by the fees specified in section 2-2705.

(4) If an official test application, with the required specifications and fees, is submitted to any Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development test station or to the University of Nebraska and an application for a temporary permit is submitted, the department, with the approval of the board, may issue a temporary permit for the sale of the tractor model specified in the official test application. The date on which the temporary permit terminates shall be fixed by the board. All temporary permits shall be conditioned upon such tractor model being tested at a mutually agreed-upon date, and the person to whom a temporary permit has been issued shall submit a tractor model for testing which conforms to the specifications filed with the official test application. Such tractor model shall be delivered for testing at the mutually agreed-upon date. Upon failure so to do, all such fees deposited by such person shall be forfeited to the University of Nebraska Tractor Test Cash Fund, and in addition such person shall not be issued any temporary permit for a period of five years from the date such tractor was to be delivered for testing and until such person meets the obligations required under subsection (5) of this section to the department's satisfaction.

(5) All sales of tractors upon which a temporary permit has been issued shall be made subject to the final official test and approval of the tractor model as follows:

(a) If a tractor model upon which a temporary permit has been issued was not submitted for the official test and approval on the mutually agreed-upon date, the person to whom the temporary permit was issued shall repurchase any such tractor sold in Nebraska under the temporary permit. A claim by a purchaser under this subdivision shall be brought within two years after the date of the expiration of the temporary permit; and

(b) If a tractor model upon which a temporary permit has been issued fails in the official test to meet the specifications of the tractor model which were filed with the application and fee, the person to whom the temporary permit was issued shall send a notice, as approved by the department, to any person in Nebraska who has purchased a tractor sold under the temporary permit. The person to whom the temporary permit was issued shall either modify the tractor to meet the specifications filed with the board or remedy to the satisfaction of the purchaser any injury incurred by the purchaser which was caused by the failure of the tractor to meet the specifications claimed. Such person shall be prohibited from modifying sales literature, advertisement claims, or specifications of the tractor to avoid such notice.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 36, p. 1394;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-336;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 1, p. 1486;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB907, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 122.
July 1, 2026